North Carolina statutes. Chapter 132. Public Records.
§ 132-6.1.
Electronic data-processing and computer databases as public records.

Databases purchased, leased, created, or otherwise acquired by every public agency containing public records shall be designed and maintained in a manner that does not impair or impede the public agency’s ability to permit the public inspection and examination of public records and provides a means of obtaining copies of such records. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require the retention by the public agency of obsolete hardware or software.

(a1)

Notwithstanding

G.S. 132-6

.2(a), a public agency may satisfy the requirement under

G.S. 132-6

to provide access to public records in computer databases by making public records in computer databases individually available online in a format that allows a person to view the public record and print or save the public record to obtain a copy. A public agency that provides access to public records under this subsection is not required to provide access to the public records in the computer database in any other way; provided, however, that a public agency that provides access to public records in computer databases shall also allow inspection of any of such public records that the public agency also maintains in a nondigital medium.

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-10, s. 2.9(a), effective July 1, 2017.

Nothing in this section shall require a public agency to create a computer database that the public agency has not otherwise created or is not otherwise required to be created. Nothing in this section requires a public agency to disclose security features of its electronic data processing systems, information technology systems, telecommunications networks, or electronic security systems, including hardware or software security, passwords, or security standards, procedures, processes, configurations, software, and codes.

The following definitions apply in this section:

Computer database. — A structured collection of data or documents residing in a database management program or spreadsheet software.

Computer hardware. — Any tangible machine or device utilized for the electronic storage, manipulation, or retrieval of data.

Computer program. — A series of instructions or statements that permit the storage, manipulation, and retrieval of data within an electronic data-processing system, together with any associated documentation. The term does not include the original data, or any analysis, compilation, or manipulated form of the original data produced by the use of the program or software.

Computer software. — Any set or combination of computer programs. The term does not include the original data, or any analysis, compilation, or manipulated form of the original data produced by the use of the program or software.

Electronic data-processing system. — Computer hardware, computer software, or computer programs or any combination thereof, regardless of kind or origin.

Media or medium — The physical medium on which information is stored in recoverable form.

History.

1995, c. 388, s. 3; 2000-71, s. 1; 2002-159, s. 35(i); 2017-10, s. 2.9(a).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-10, s. 2.9(a), effective July 1, 2017, inserted “and computer databases as public” in the section heading; rewrote subsection (a), which read: “After June 30, 1996, no public agency shall purchase, lease, create, or otherwise acquire any electronic data processing system for the storage, manipulation, or retrieval of public records unless it first determines that the system will not impair or impede the agency’s ability to permit the public inspection and examination, and to provide electronic copies of such records. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require the retention by the public agency of obsolete hardware or software”; added subsection (a1); deleted subsection (b); and added subdivision (d)(6).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

Computer software developed by the State with the assistance of a private contractor is not a “record,”

and its disclosure may cause a breach in software security inconsistent with this section.
See opinion of Attorney General to Commissioner Janice Faulkner, North Carolina Division of Motor Vehicles, 1998 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 25 (5/28/98).

The Employment Security Commission was not required to replace confidential social security numbers with a non-identifying code

in order to allow the analysis of data in the Common Follow-Up System without revealing confidential, personally identifiable information. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. T.S. Whitaker, Deputy Chairman for Programs, Employment Security Commission of N.C. 1999 N.C. AG LEXIS 26 (9/20/99).

Members of the Information Resources Management Commission, or their delegates, who are representatives of other agencies may be present at the committee meeting during which information will be reported about audits of the security practices of information technology systems in specific agencies; the presence of these representatives does not waive the confidentiality of the security features of the systems under subsection (c) of this section. See opinion of Attorney General to Beverly Eaves Perdue, Lieutenant Governor, 2002 N.C. Op. Att'y Gen. 28 (11/8/02).

§ 132-6.2.
Provisions for copies of public records; fees.

Persons requesting copies of public records may elect to obtain them in any and all media in which the public agency is capable of providing them. No request for copies of public records in a particular medium shall be denied on the grounds that the custodian has made or prefers to make the public records available in another medium. The public agency may assess different fees for different media as prescribed by law.

Persons requesting copies of public records may request that the copies be certified or uncertified. The fees for certifying copies of public records shall be as provided by law. Except as otherwise provided by law, no public agency shall charge a fee for an uncertified copy of a public record that exceeds the actual cost to the public agency of making the copy. For purposes of this subsection, “actual cost” is limited to direct, chargeable costs related to the reproduction of a public record as determined by generally accepted accounting principles and does not include costs that would have been incurred by the public agency if a request to reproduce a public record had not been made. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection, if the request is such as to require extensive use of information technology resources or extensive clerical or supervisory assistance by personnel of the agency involved, or if producing the record in the medium requested results in a greater use of information technology resources than that established by the agency for reproduction of the volume of information requested, then the agency may charge, in addition to the actual cost of duplication, a special service charge, which shall be reasonable and shall be based on the actual cost incurred for such extensive use of information technology resources or the labor costs of the personnel providing the services, or for a greater use of information technology resources that is actually incurred by the agency or attributable to the agency. If anyone requesting public information from any public agency is charged a fee that the requester believes to be unfair or unreasonable, the requester may ask the State Chief Information Officer or his designee to mediate the dispute.

Persons requesting copies of computer databases may be required to make or submit such requests in writing. Custodians of public records shall respond to all such requests as promptly as possible. If the request is granted, the copies shall be provided as soon as reasonably possible. If the request is denied, the denial shall be accompanied by an explanation of the basis for the denial. If asked to do so, the person denying the request shall, as promptly as possible, reduce the explanation for the denial to writing.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a public agency to respond to requests for copies of public records outside of its usual business hours.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a public agency to respond to a request for a copy of a public record by creating or compiling a record that does not exist. If a public agency, as a service to the requester, voluntarily elects to create or compile a record, it may negotiate a reasonable charge for the service with the requester. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a public agency to put into electronic medium a record that is not kept in electronic medium.

History.

1995, c. 388, s. 3; 2004-129, s. 38.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-129, s. 38, effective July 1, 2004, substituted “State Chief Information Officer or his designee” for “Information Resource Management Commission” in subsection (b).

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Fired by Liars: Due Process Implications in the Recent Changes to North Carolina’s Public Disclosure Laws,” see 89 N.C.L. Rev. 2228 (2011).

§ 132-7.
Keeping records in safe places; copying or repairing; certified copies.

Insofar as possible, custodians of public records shall keep them in fireproof safes, vaults, or rooms fitted with noncombustible materials and in such arrangement as to be easily accessible for convenient use. All public records should be kept in the buildings in which they are ordinarily used. Record books should be copied or repaired, renovated or rebound if worn, mutilated, damaged or difficult to read. Whenever any State, county, or municipal records are in need of repair, restoration, or rebinding, the head of such State agency, department, board, or commission, the board of county commissioners of such county, or the governing body of such municipality may authorize that the records in need of repair, restoration, or rebinding be removed from the building or office in which such records are ordinarily kept, for the length of time required to repair, restore, or rebind them. Any public official who causes a record book to be copied shall attest it and shall certify on oath that it is an accurate copy of the original book. The copy shall then have the force of the original.

History.

1935, c. 265, s. 7; 1951, c. 294.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “You Can’t Always Get What You Want: A Look at North Carolina’s Public Records Law,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1527 (1994).

§ 132-8.
Assistance by and to Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.

The Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall have the right to examine into the condition of public records and shall give advice and assistance to public officials in the solution of their problems of preserving, filing and making available the public records in their custody. When requested by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources, public officials shall assist the Department in the preparation of an inclusive inventory of records in their custody, to which shall be attached a schedule, approved by the head of the governmental unit or agency having custody of the records and the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources, establishing a time period for the retention or disposal of each series of records. Upon the completion of the inventory and schedule, the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall (subject to the availability of necessary space, staff, and other facilities for such purposes) make available space in its Records Center for the filing of semicurrent records so scheduled and in its archives for noncurrent records of permanent value, and shall render such other assistance as needed, including the microfilming of records so scheduled.

History.

1935, c. 265, s. 8; 1943, c. 237; 1959, c. 68, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 2015-241, ss. 14.30(s), (t).

§ 132-8.1.
Records management program administered by Department of Natural and Cultural Resources; establishment of standards, procedures, etc.; surveys.

A records management program for the application of efficient and economical management methods to the creation, utilization, maintenance, retention, preservation, and disposal of official records shall be administered by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources. It shall be the duty of that Department, in cooperation with and with the approval of the Department of Administration, to establish standards, procedures, and techniques for effective management of public records, to make continuing surveys of paper work operations, and to recommend improvements in current records management practices including the use of space, equipment, and supplies employed in creating, maintaining, and servicing records. It shall be the duty of the head of each State agency and the governing body of each county, municipality and other subdivision of government to cooperate with the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources in conducting surveys and to establish and maintain an active, continuing program for the economical and efficient management of the records of said agency, county, municipality, or other subdivision of government.

History.

1961, c. 1041; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

§ 132-8.2.
Selection and preservation of records considered essential; making or designation of preservation duplicates; force and effect of duplicates or copies thereof.

In cooperation with the head of each State agency and the governing body of each county, municipality, and other subdivision of government, the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources shall establish and maintain a program for the selection and preservation of public records considered essential to the operation of government and to the protection of the rights and interests of persons, and, within the limitations of funds available for the purpose, shall make or cause to be made preservation duplicates or designate as preservation duplicates existing copies of such essential public records. Preservation duplicates shall be durable, accurate, complete and clear, and such duplicates made by a photographic, photostatic, microfilm, micro card, miniature photographic, or other process which accurately reproduces and forms a durable medium for so reproducing the original shall have the same force and effect for all purposes as the original record whether the original record is in existence or not. A transcript, exemplification, or certified copy of such preservation duplicate shall be deemed for all purposes to be a transcript, exemplification, or certified copy of the original record. Such preservation duplicates shall be preserved in the place and manner of safekeeping prescribed by the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources.

History.

1961, c. 1041; 1973, c. 476, s. 48; 2015-241, s. 14.30(s).

§ 132-9.
Access to records.

Any person who is denied access to public records for purposes of inspection and examination, or who is denied copies of public records, may apply to the appropriate division of the General Court of Justice for an order compelling disclosure or copying, and the court shall have jurisdiction to issue such orders if the person has complied with

G.S. 7A-38.3

E. Actions brought pursuant to this section shall be set down for immediate hearing, and subsequent proceedings in such actions shall be accorded priority by the trial and appellate courts.

In an action to compel disclosure of public records which have been withheld pursuant to the provisions of

G.S. 132-6

concerning public records relating to the proposed expansion or location of particular businesses and industrial projects, the burden shall be on the custodian withholding the records to show that disclosure would frustrate the purpose of attracting that particular business or industrial project.

In any action brought pursuant to this section in which a party successfully compels the disclosure of public records, the court shall allow a party seeking disclosure of public records who substantially prevails to recover its reasonable attorneys’ fees if attributed to those public records. The court may not assess attorneys’ fees against the governmental body or governmental unit if the court finds that the governmental body or governmental unit acted in reasonable reliance on any of the following:

A judgment or an order of a court applicable to the governmental unit or governmental body.

The published opinion of an appellate court, an order of the North Carolina Business Court, or a final order of the Trial Division of the General Court of Justice.

A written opinion, decision, or letter of the Attorney General.Any attorneys’ fees assessed against a public agency under this section shall be charged against the operating expenses of the agency; provided, however, that the court may order that all or any portion of any attorneys’ fees so assessed be paid personally by any public employee or public official found by the court to have knowingly or intentionally committed, caused, permitted, suborned, or participated in a violation of this Article. No order against any public employee or public official shall issue in any case where the public employee or public official seeks the advice of an attorney and such advice is followed.

If the court determines that an action brought pursuant to this section was filed in bad faith or was frivolous, the court shall assess a reasonable attorney’s fee against the person or persons instituting the action and award it to the public agency as part of the costs.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, the court may not assess attorneys’ fees against a public hospital created under Article 2 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes if the court finds that the action was brought by or on behalf of a competing health care provider for obtaining information to be used to gain a competitive advantage.

History.

1935, c. 265, s. 9; 1975, c. 787, s. 3; 1987, c. 835, s. 2; 1995, c. 388, s. 4; 2005-332, s. 2; 2010-169, s. 21(c).

Local Modification.

Durham: 1993, c. 227, s. 9; New Hanover: 1981, c. 960; Orange: 1993, c. 358, s. 14; 1995, c. 339, s. 2; city of Asheville: 1999, c. 206, s. 9; city of Durham: 1993, c. 227, s. 9; city of Gastonia: 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 902, s. 8; 1991, c. 557, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to trade secret and confidentiality determination and protections, see

G.S. 113-391.1

.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-332, s. 2, effective October 1, 2005, in subsection (c), combined the former introductory paragraph and subdivisions (1) and (2) into the present first paragraph, and rewrote it; and in subsection (d), substituted “shall assess” for “may, in its discretion, assess.”

Session Laws 2010-169, s. 21(c), effective October 1, 2010, and applicable to actions filed on or after that date, added “if the person has complied with

G.S. 7A-38.3

E” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a); rewrote the first paragraph of subsection (c); and added subsection (e).

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on public access to government-held records, see 55 N.C.L. Rev. 1187 (1977).

For survey of 1981 administrative law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1165 (1982).

For comment, “You Can’t Always Get What You Want: A Look at North Carolina’s Public Records Law,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1527 (1994).

§ 132-10.
Qualified exception for geographical information systems.

Geographical information systems databases and data files developed and operated by counties and cities are public records within the meaning of this Chapter. The county or city shall provide public access to such systems by public access terminals or other output devices. Upon request, the county or city shall furnish copies, in documentary or electronic form, to anyone requesting them at reasonable cost. As a condition of furnishing an electronic copy, whether on magnetic tape, magnetic disk, compact disk, or photo-optical device, a county or city may require that the person obtaining the copy agree in writing that the copy will not be resold or otherwise used for trade or commercial purposes. For purposes of this section, publication or broadcast by the news media, real estate trade associations, or Multiple Listing Services operated by real estate trade associations shall not constitute a resale or use of the data for trade or commercial purposes and use of information without resale by a licensed professional in the course of practicing the professional’s profession shall not constitute use for a commercial purpose. For purposes of this section, resale at cost by a real estate trade association or Multiple Listing Services operated by a real estate trade association shall not constitute a resale or use of the data for trade or commercial purposes.

History.

1995, c. 388, s. 5; 1997-193, s. 1.

§ 132-11.
Time limitation on confidentiality of records.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all restrictions on access to public records shall expire 100 years after the creation of the record.

Subsection (a) of this section shall apply to any public record in existence at the time of, or created after, August 18, 2015.

No provision of this section shall be construed to authorize or require the opening of any record that meets any of the following criteria:

Is ordered to be sealed by any state or federal court, except as provided by that court.

Is prohibited from being disclosed under federal law, rule, or regulation.

Contains federal Social Security numbers.

Is a juvenile, probationer, parolee, post-releasee, or prison inmate record, including medical and mental health records.

Contains detailed plans and drawings of public buildings and infrastructure facilities.

For purposes of this section, the custodian of the record shall be the Department of Natural and Cultural Resources or other agency in actual possession of the record.

History.

2015-218, s. 3; 2015-241, s. 14.30(c).